Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 3

Operation and Powers

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2017, ch. 431, § 1 provided, in part, that the Tennessee advisory commission on intergovernmental relations (TACIR) is directed to perform a study of the payment in lieu of ad valorem tax agreements and leases entered into by industrial development corporations organized by municipalities, and specifically, whether economic benefits are derived from limiting the length of term of an agreement or lease in the absence of county approval or an agreement by the corporation or municipality to pay the county a sum equal to the amount of real property tax that would have been assessed in the absence of the agreement or lease following the expiration of the initial term.

7-53-301. Board of directors.

The corporation shall have a board of directors in which all powers of the corporation shall be vested and which shall consist of any number, not less than seven (7), all of whom shall be duly qualified electors of and taxpayers in the municipality. The directors shall serve as such without compensation, except that they shall be reimbursed for their actual expenses incurred in and about the performance of their duties, unless otherwise authorized by local ordinance or resolution. No director shall be an officer or employee of the municipality. The directors shall be elected by the governing body of the municipality, and they shall be so elected that they shall hold office for staggered terms. At the time of the election of the first board of directors, the governing body of the municipality shall divide the directors into three (3) groups containing as near equal whole numbers as may be possible. The first term of the directors included in the first group shall be two (2) years, the first term of the directors included in the second group shall be four (4) years, the first term of the directors included in the third group shall be six (6) years, and thereafter the terms of all directors shall be six (6) years; provided, that if at the expiration of any term of office of any director a successor to the director shall not have been elected, then the director whose term of office shall have expired shall continue to hold office until a successor shall be so elected. Except for corporations acquiring any hotel, motel or apartment building in the center-city areas of a municipality that has created a central business improvement district pursuant to chapter 84 of this title, if at the time of the election of any directors there shall be in existence in the municipality a chamber of commerce, board of trade, or other similar civic organization, the directors elected shall be chosen by the governing body from the membership of any one (1) or more of such organizations, unless, in the judgment of the governing body, there are no members of such organizations who are both suitable and available to serve as directors of the corporation; provided, that if the municipality has within its boundaries a closed or substantially downsized federal facility, including, but not limited to, a facility formerly operated by the United States department of defense or department of energy, a minority of the directors may be chosen from persons who are not residents of the municipality.

Acts 1955, ch. 210, § 7; 1978, ch. 739, § 5; T.C.A., § 6-2807; Acts 1998, ch. 983, § 2; 2001, ch. 125, § 1.

Cross-References. Board of commissioners of Tennessee River four-county port authority as board of directors of industrial development corporation, §64-4-105.

Attorney General Opinions. Election of directors in home rule municipalities, OAG 97-097, 1997 Tenn. AG LEXIS 106 (7/1/97).

Persons qualified to petition for the establishment of industrial development board, OAG 99-142, 1999 Tenn. AG LEXIS 179 (7/27/99).

A “duly qualified elector of the municipality” means a person qualified to vote in an election of the “municipality,” as that term is defined in T.C.A. §7-53-101(10). Improperly appointed members of boards are generally viewed as de facto officers, and acts of such officers are considered valid. Nevertheless, as a precaution, the board, once all of its members are appropriately appointed, may wish to review the actions taken by the earlier board and vote to ratify, confirm, modify, or reject such actions. OAG 15-72, 2015 Tenn. AG LEXIS 73 (11/3/2015).

7-53-302. Corporate powers — Meetings public.

The corporation has the following powers, together with all powers incidental to such powers or necessary for the performance of those powers, to:

Have succession by its corporate name for the period specified in the certificate of incorporation, unless sooner dissolved;

Sue and be sued and prosecute and defend, at law or in equity, in any court having jurisdiction of the subject matter and of the parties;

Have and use a corporate seal and alter the corporate seal at pleasure;

Acquire, whether by purchase, exchange, gift, lease, or otherwise, and improve, maintain, equip and furnish one (1) or more projects, including all real and personal properties the board of directors of the corporation may deem necessary in connection with the projects and regardless of whether or not any such projects shall then be in existence; provided, that no hotel, motel or apartment building shall be purchased or otherwise acquired by a corporation under this subdivision (a)(4) after July 1, 1988, except that this proviso shall not affect the development or financing of any project that is located in a center city area or in a central business improvement district and that involves an apartment or residential building, hotel, motel or of any project acquired prior to July 1, 1988, regardless of when such project is completed, nor shall this proviso be construed to impair, limit, abrogate or modify the contractual rights and obligations that any such corporation assumes with the issuance of any bonds, notes or other forms of indebtedness or any other contract, nor shall this proviso apply to any hotel listed in the National Register of Historic Places acquired by the corporation prior to December 31, 1989, nor shall this proviso apply to any hotel that contains conference or convention center facilities containing at least seventy-five thousand square feet (75,000 sq. ft.), nor shall this proviso apply to any hotel or hotels, and related conference, mixed use or convention center facilities, if any, constructed in connection with a project or series of related projects involving an aggregate investment of public and private funds in excess of two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000), nor shall this proviso apply to any project located in a county having a population greater than nine hundred thousand (900,000), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census, nor shall this proviso apply to any project described in § 7-53-101(15)(E);

Lease to others one (1) or more projects and charge and collect rent for the projects and terminate any such lease upon the failure of the lessee to comply with any of the obligations of such lease; and include in any such lease, if desired, a provision that the lessee of the projects shall have options to purchase any or all of its projects or that upon payment of all of the indebtedness of the corporation it may lease or convey any or all of its projects to the lessee of the projects with or without consideration, and to enter into amendments to such leases, which amendments, among other things, may provide for extending the terms of such leases, amending or extending any payments in lieu of taxes due under the leases, subject to any applicable limitations provided in § 7-53-305(b), and amending or extending any rents or other payments due under the leases;

Sell to others one (1) or more projects for such payments and upon such terms and conditions as the board of directors of the corporation may deem advisable, in accordance with sale contracts entered into pursuant to this chapter;

Enter into loan agreements with others with respect to one (1) or more projects for such payments and upon such terms and conditions as the board of directors of the corporation may deem advisable, in accordance with this chapter;

Sell, exchange, donate and convey any or all of its properties, including, without limitation, all or any part of the rents, revenues and receipts of the corporation from its projects, whenever its board of directors shall find any such action to be in furtherance of the purposes for which the corporation was organized;

Issue its bonds, and otherwise borrow money from banks or other financial institutions by issuing its notes for the purpose of carrying out any of its powers;

Borrow money from a municipality through a loan agreement executed with a municipality for the purpose of carrying out any of its powers;

As security for the payment of the principal of and interest on any bonds or notes so issued and any agreements made in connection with the bonds or notes, or to secure any indebtedness or obligations of any lessee of the corporation, mortgage and pledge any or all of its projects or any part or parts of the projects, whether then owned or thereafter acquired, and pledge the revenues and receipts from any projects, or assign and pledge all or any part of its interest in and rights under the leases, sale contracts or loan agreements relating to the projects, including, without limitation, the pledging and/or assignment and pledging of all or any part of the rents, revenues and receipts of any project as security for payment of any bonds or notes of the corporation issued with respect to the project, or any other project or projects of the corporation and any agreements made in connection with the projects, or procure or pledge municipal bond insurance, letters of credit, lines of credit or other liquidity facilities as additional security and liquidity for the bonds or notes;

Employ and pay compensation to such employees and agents, including attorneys, as the board of directors shall deem necessary for the business of the corporation; and

Exercise all powers expressly given in its certificate of incorporation and establish bylaws and make all rules and regulations not inconsistent with the certificate of incorporation or this chapter, deemed expedient for the management of the corporation's affairs.

The corporation does not have the power to operate any project financed under this chapter as a business or in any manner except as specifically provided in this chapter, nor does it have the power to pledge at any time or in any manner the general credit or taxing power of the municipality except as provided in § 7-53-306.

Any meeting held by the board of directors for any purpose whatsoever shall be open to the public.

In addition to the powers specified in subsection (a) and upon the adoption of a resolution of the county legislative body, a corporation in any county having a population of over nine hundred thousand (900,000), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census:

Has the following powers, together with all powers incidental to such powers or necessary for the performance of those powers, to:

Enter into loan agreements with others with respect to one (1) or more projects or for activities, costs, debt restructuring or working capital associated with projects for such payments or deferrals and upon such terms and conditions as the board of directors of the corporation may deem advisable in accordance with this chapter; and

Sell, exchange, donate, forgive debt, grant and convey any or all of its assets or properties, including, without limitation, all or any part of the rents, revenues and receipts of the corporation from its projects, whenever its board of directors shall find any such action to be in furtherance of the purposes for which the corporation was organized; and

Shall not enter into a loan agreement, accept a note or issue any indebtedness, or otherwise provide financing for working capital that:

Exceeds two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) in principal amount to any project or borrower; or

Provides for a term in excess of five (5) years, including any renewals or extensions of such financing.

Acts 1955, ch. 210, § 8; 1959, ch. 222, § 3; 1970, ch. 587, §§ 1-3; 1976, ch. 515, § 3; 1978, ch. 739, § 7; T.C.A., § 6-2808; Acts 1989, ch. 180, § 1; 1990, ch. 1089, § 1; 1993, ch. 197, § 2; 1998, ch. 828, §§ 1-3; 2007, ch. 461, § 6; 2007, ch. 524, § 2; 2009, ch. 84, § 2; 2014, ch. 752, § 1; 2018, ch. 728, § 1; 2020, ch. 722, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment added “, nor shall this proviso apply to any project located in a county having a population greater than nine hundred thousand (900,000), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census” at the end of (a)(4).

The 2020 amendment added “, nor shall this proviso apply to any project described in §7-53-101(15)(E)” at the end of (a)(4).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 728, § 2. April 18, 2018.

Acts 2020, ch. 722, § 2, June 22, 2020.

Cross-References. Credit against excise tax on corporate earnings, §67-4-2009.

Sales and use taxes, title 67, ch. 6.

Attorney General Opinions. An industrial development corporation lacked statutory authority to establish an incentive loan program to benefit private for-profit entities make a loan unless it was for a “project” as defined and, even if the loan was for a project, it lacked authority to forgive the debt if a certain number of new jobs should be created by the borrower, OAG 03-147, 2003 Tenn. AG LEXIS 169 (11/17/03).

City’s Use of Payments Received Through Industrial Development Corporation to Fund Workforce Training Programs. OAG 15-43, 2015 Tenn. AG LEXIS 66 (4/30/15).

7-53-303. Issuance of bonds — Restrictions on payment — Delivery — Additional issues — Redemption.

Except as otherwise expressly provided in this chapter, all bonds issued by the corporation shall be payable solely out of the revenues and receipts derived from the corporation's projects or of any of the projects as may be designated in the proceedings of the board of directors under which the bonds shall be authorized to be issued, including debt obligations of the lessee or contracting party obtained from or in connection with the financing of a project; provided, that notes issued in anticipation of the issuance of bonds may be retired out of the proceeds of such bonds. Such bonds may be executed and delivered by the corporation at any time and from time to time, may be in such form and denominations and of such terms and maturities, may be in registered or bearer form either as to principal or interest, or both, may be payable in such installments and at such time or times not exceeding forty (40) years from the date of execution, may be payable at such place or places whether within or without the state of Tennessee, may bear interest at such rate or rates payable at such time or times and at such place or places and evidenced in such manner, may be executed by such officers of the corporation and may contain such provisions not inconsistent with this chapter, all as shall be provided in the proceedings of the board of directors whereunder the bonds shall be authorized to be issued. If deemed advisable by the board of directors, there may be retained in the proceedings under which any bonds of the corporation are authorized to be issued an option to redeem all or any part of the bonds as may be specified in such proceedings, at such price or prices and after such notice or notices and on such terms and conditions as may be set forth in such proceedings and as may be briefly recited in the face of the bonds, but nothing contained in this subsection (a) shall be construed to confer on the corporation any right or option to redeem any bonds except as may be provided in the proceedings under which they shall be issued. Any bonds of the corporation may be sold at public or private sale in such manner, at such price and from time to time as may be determined by the board of directors of the corporation to be most advantageous, and the corporation may pay all expenses, premiums and commissions the corporation's board of directors may deem necessary or advantageous in connection with the issuance of the bonds. Issuance by the corporation of one (1) or more series of bonds for one (1) or more purposes shall not preclude the corporation from issuing other bonds in connection with the same project or any other project, but the proceedings whereunder any subsequent bonds may be issued shall recognize and protect any prior pledge or mortgage made for any prior issue of bonds. Proceeds of bonds issued by the corporation may be used for the purpose of constructing, acquiring, reconstructing, improving, equipping, furnishing, bettering, or extending any project or projects, including the payment of interest on the bonds during construction of any such project and for two (2) years after the estimated date of completion, and payment of engineering, fiscal, architectural and legal expenses incurred in connection with such project and the issuance of the bonds, and the establishment of a reasonable reserve fund for the payment of principal of and interest on such bonds in the event of a deficiency in the revenues and receipts available for such payment.

Any bonds or notes of the corporation at any time outstanding may at any time and from time to time be refunded by the corporation by the issuance of its refunding bonds in such amount as the board of directors may deem necessary, but not exceeding the sum of the following:

The principal amount of the obligations being refinanced;

Applicable redemption premiums on the bonds;

Unpaid interest on such obligations to the date of delivery or exchange of the refunding bonds;

In the event the proceeds from the sale of the refunding bonds are to be deposited in trust as provided in subdivision (f)(2), interest to accrue on such obligations from the date of delivery to the first or any subsequent available redemption date or dates selected, in its discretion, by the board of directors, or to the date or dates of maturity, whichever shall be determined by the board of directors to be most advantageous or necessary to the corporation;

A reasonable reserve for the payment of principal of and interest on such bonds or a renewal and replacement reserve;

If the project to be constructed from the proceeds of the obligations being refinanced has not been completed, an amount sufficient to meet the interest charges on the refunding bonds during the construction of such project and for two (2) years after the estimated date of completion, but only to the extent that interest charges have not been capitalized from the proceeds of the obligations being refinanced; and

Expenses, premiums and commissions of the corporation, including bond discounts, deemed by the board of directors to be necessary for the issuance of the refunding bonds. A determination by the board of directors that any refinancing is advantageous or necessary to the corporation, or that any of the amounts provided in the preceding sentence should be included in such refinancing, or that any of the obligations to be refinanced should be called for redemption on the first or any subsequent available redemption date or permitted to remain outstanding until their respective dates of maturity, shall be conclusive.

Any such refunding may be effected whether the obligations to be refunded has then matured or thereafter matures, either by the exchange of the refunding bonds for the obligations to be refunded by the refunding bonds with the consent of the holders of the obligations so to be refunded, or by sale of the refunding bonds and the application of the proceeds of the refunding bonds to the payment of the obligations to be refunded by the refunding bonds, and regardless of whether or not the obligations to be refunded were issued in connection with the same projects or separate projects, and regardless of whether or not the obligations proposed to be refunded shall be payable on the same date or different dates or shall be due serially or otherwise.

If, at the time of delivery of the refunding bonds, the obligations to be refunded will not be retired or a valid and timely notice of redemption of the outstanding obligations is not given in accordance with the resolution, indenture or other instrument governing the redemption of the outstanding obligations, then, prior to the issuance of the refunding bonds, the board of directors shall cause to be given a notice of its intention to issue the refunding bonds. The notice shall be given either by mail to the owners of all of the outstanding obligations to be refunded at their addresses shown on the bond registration records for the outstanding obligations or given by publication one (1) time each in the newspaper having a general circulation in the municipality with respect to which the corporation was organized and in a financial newspaper published in New York, New York, having a national circulation. The notice shall set forth the estimated date of delivery of the refunding bonds and identify the obligations, or the individual maturities of the obligations, proposed to be refunded; provided, that if portions of individual maturities are proposed to be refunded, the notice shall identify the maturities subject to partial refunding in the aggregate principal amount to be refunded within each maturity. If the issuance of the refunding bonds does not occur as provided in the notice, the board of directors shall cause notice to be given as provided in this subsection (d). Except as otherwise set forth in this section, the notice required pursuant to this section shall be given whether or not any of the obligations to be refunded are to be called for redemption.

If any of the obligations to be refunded are to be called for redemption, the board of directors shall cause notice of redemption to be given in the manner required by the proceedings authorizing such outstanding obligations.

The principal proceeds from the sale of any refunding bonds shall be applied only as follows, either:

To the immediate payment and retirement of the obligations being refunded; or

To the extent not required for the immediate payment of the obligations being refunded, then such proceeds shall be deposited in trust to provide for the payment and retirement of the obligations being refunded, and to pay any expenses incurred in connection with such refunding, but provision may be made for the pledging and disposition of any surplus, including, without limitation, provision for the pledging of any such surplus to the payment of the principal of and interest on any issue or series of refunding bonds. Money in any such trust fund may be invested in direct obligations of, or obligations the principal of and interest on which are guaranteed by the United States government, or obligations of any agency or instrumentality of the United States government, or in certificates of deposit issued by a bank or trust company located in the state of Tennessee, if such certificates shall be secured by a pledge of any of such obligations having any aggregate market value, exclusive of accrued interest, equal at least to the principal amount of the certificates so secured. Nothing in this subdivision (f)(2) shall be construed as a limitation on the duration of any deposit in trust for the retirement of obligations being refunded but which shall not have matured and which shall not be presently redeemable or, if presently redeemable, shall not have been called for redemption.

All such bonds, refunding bonds and the interest coupons applicable to the bonds are hereby made and shall be construed to be negotiable instruments.

For purposes of calculating the “applicable formula rate” under § 47-14-103 and the related provisions of title 47, chapter 14, to determine the maximum effective rate applicable to bonds or other obligations designated as “recovery zone facility bonds” pursuant to the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 (ARRA), P.L. 111-5, the language “four (4) percentage points above the average prime loan rate” in the definition of “formula rate” in § 47-14-102 shall be replaced with the language “seven (7) percentage points above the average prime loan rate”. This subsection (h) shall apply to any such bonds or other obligations issued by a corporation on or before June 30, 2012, and designated as recovery zone facility bonds for purposes of the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009.

Acts 1955, ch. 210, § 9; 1967, ch. 109, § 1; 1972, ch. 779, § 2; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 852, § 12; 1973, ch. 309, § 3; 1976, ch. 515, § 4; 1977, ch. 229, § 1; T.C.A., § 6-2809; Acts 1980, ch. 536, § 2; 1989, ch. 402, § 2; 1994, ch. 806, § 3; 2010, ch. 1134, § 59.

Cross-References. Bonds and income therefrom exempt from taxation retroactive to date of issue, §7-53-305.

Public entities, information concerning debt obligation issuances, §9-21-134.

7-53-304. Security for payment of bonds — Default — Bondholders' remedies — Maintenance of aggregate listing of debt.

The principal of and interest on any bonds issued by the corporation shall be secured by a pledge of the revenues and receipts out of which the bonds shall be made payable, and may be secured by a mortgage or deed of trust covering all or any part of the projects from which the revenues or receipts so pledged may be derived, including any enlargements of and additions to any such projects thereafter made, or by an assignment and pledge of all or any part of the corporation's interest in and rights under the leases, sale contracts or loan agreements relating to such projects, or any thereof. The resolution under which the bonds are authorized to be issued and any such mortgage or deed of trust may contain any agreements and provisions respecting the maintenance of the projects covered by the resolution, the fixing and collection of rents or payments with respect to any projects or portions of the projects covered by such resolution, mortgage or deed of trust, the creation and maintenance of special funds from such revenues and from the proceeds of such bonds, and the rights and remedies available in the event of default, all as the board of directors shall deem advisable not in conflict with this section. Each pledge, agreement, mortgage and deed of trust made for the benefit or security of any of the bonds of the corporation shall continue effective until the principal of and interest on the bonds for the benefit of which the pledge, agreement, mortgage and deed of trust were made shall have been fully paid. In the event of default in such payment or in any agreements of the corporation made as a part of the contract under which the bonds were issued, whether contained in the proceedings authorizing the bonds or in any mortgage and deed of trust executed as security for the bonds, such payment or agreement may be enforced by suit, mandamus, the appointment of a receiver in equity, or by foreclosure of any such mortgage and deed of trust, or any one (1) or more of such remedies.

The corporation shall maintain an aggregate listing of its current debt, including conduit debt obligations, in accordance with guidelines approved by the state funding board. At the end of each fiscal year, the corporation shall file the listing, and any other information required by the guidelines, with the state funding board. The corporation shall file with the board notice of default on any of its debt obligations within fifteen (15) days of the event. As used in this subsection (b), “conduit debt obligations” means those debt obligations issued by the corporation to provide capital financing for a public or private entity.

Acts 1955, ch. 210, § 10; 1976, ch. 515, § 5; T.C.A., § 6-2810; Acts 2018, ch. 529, § 1.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment added (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 529, § 2. March 7, 2018.